Georgia statutes. TITLE 18 Debtor and Creditor
Article 4 Judgment, Execution, and Levy

18-3-70.
Property bound by judgment in attachment.

When the defendant has given bond and security, or when he has appeared and made defense by himself or attorney at law without raising a valid defense of lack of jurisdiction over the person, the judgment rendered against him in such case shall bind all his property and shall have the same force and effect as when there has been personal service, and execution shall issue accordingly, but it shall be first levied upon the property attached. In all other cases, the judgment on the attachment shall only bind the property attached and the judgment shall be entered only against such property.

History.

Code 1933, § 8-901, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 1578, § 1; Code 1981, §

18-3-70

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 1578, § 2.

18-3-71.
Setting aside judgment.

A judgment in attachment may be set aside in a court of law upon an issue suggesting fraud or want of consideration, tendered by a judgment creditor of the defendant in attachment.

History.

Code 1933, § 8-902, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 1578, § 1; Code 1981, §

18-3-71

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 1578, § 2.

18-3-72.
Execution and levy on judgment.

After the judgment has been obtained in any case of attachment, execution shall issue as in cases at common law, which execution shall be levied in the same manner as executions issuing at common law; and the proceedings in all respects shall be the same, except that when the judgment only binds the property levied on by the attachment, as aforesaid, the execution shall be issued against such property only and that property only shall be levied on and sold.

History.

Code 1933, § 8-903, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 1578, § 1; Code 1981, §

18-3-72

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 1578, § 2.

18-3-73.
Application of proceeds of sale.

All money raised by the sale of defendant’s property or otherwise, by virtue of this chapter, shall be paid over to the creditors of the defendant, according to the priority of the lien of their judgments, except that as between attaching creditors the attachment first levied shall be first satisfied to the entire exclusion of any attachment of younger levy.

History.

Code 1933, § 8-904, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 1578, § 1; Code 1981, §

18-3-73

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 1578, § 2.

18-3-74.
When lien arises; priorities.

The lien of an attachment is created by the levy and not the judgment in the attachment; and in case of a conflict between attachments, the first levied shall be first satisfied; but in a contest between attachments and ordinary judgments or suits, it is the judgment and not the levy which fixes the lien. However, the lien of an attachment shall have priority over the lien of an ordinary judgment that has been obtained upon a suit filed after the levy of the attachment.

History.

Code 1933, § 8-905, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 1578, § 1; Code 1981, §

18-3-74

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 1578, § 2.

18-3-75.
Entry on attachment docket; effect of failure to make such entry.

As against the interests of third parties acting in good faith and without notice who may have acquired a transfer or lien binding any real estate, no attachment levied upon real estate shall be a lien on the same from the levy thereof unless said attachment is entered upon the attachment docket of the county in which the real estate is situated within five days from said levy. When the attachment is entered upon the docket after the five days, the lien shall date from such entry; and it shall be the duty of the sheriff to have said entry made within the five days. Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to affect the validity or force of any attachment as between the parties thereto.

History.

Code 1933, § 8-906, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 1578, § 1; Code 1981, §

18-3-75

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 1578, § 2.